Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-2130
Motorcycle safety instructor or motorcycle trainer; certificate;
term; renewal.

All certificates issued under
sections 60-2127 and 60-2129 shall be valid for two years
and may be renewed upon application to the director as provided in rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1981, LB 22, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 60-2114;

Laws 1986, LB 1004, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 148;

Laws 2011, LB170, § 11.